North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 18A. Review of Proposals to License New Occupations and Professions. [Repealed]

§§ 120-149.1 through 120-149.6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011.

History.

S. 120-149.1; 1987, c. 180, s. 1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-149.2; 1987, c. 180, s. 1; 1997-456, s. 27; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-149.3; 1987, c. 180, s. 1; 1995, c. 20, s. 14; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-149.4; 1987, c. 180, s. 1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-149.5; 1987, c. 180, s. 1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-149.6; 1987, c. 180, s. 1; 1991, c. 739, s. 16; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011.